Wyoming, session 2026, SF0069.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1.
(a) The department of environmental quality shall
enter into a memorandum of understanding or amend an
existing memorandum of understanding with the office of
state lands and investments to conduct a study to collect
information on public waste water and storm water
infrastructure in the state. This study shall be conducted
in conjunction with the ongoing efforts by the department
of environmental quality to collect information on all
drinking water infrastructure in the state.
(b) The office of state lands and investments and the
Wyoming water development office shall coordinate with and
provide any necessary assistance to the department of
environmental quality in conducting the study required
under subsection (a) of this section. Each city, town,
special district and county shall provide any data or
information on its water, waste water and storm water
infrastructure as requested by the department of
environmental quality or its designee for the study
required under subsection (a) of this section.
(c) All data collected, compiled, created, digitized
or otherwise produced pursuant to this section, including
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0069
ENROLLED ACT NO. 67, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
any geographic information system (GIS) data layers and
associated metadata, shall be the property of the state of
Wyoming and subject to the following requirements:
(i) Any contract, memorandum of understanding or
agreement with a third party for purposes of performing the
study in this section shall include a requirement that
delivery of the complete underlying datasets be made using
nonproprietary or widely used formats that are suitable for
use by governmental entities, including bulk export
capability;
(ii) The department of environmental quality
shall make data sets available for public access and
download through an official state data portal or
repository designated by the department;
(iii) Nothing in this subsection shall be
construed to require disclosure of any information that is
confidential or privileged under state or federal law.
(d) The department of environmental quality shall
report the status of the study required under subsection
(a) of this section to the select water committee not later
than November 1 of each year beginning in 2026 and ending
in 2030.
(e) There is appropriated eight million dollars
($8,000,000.00) from the strategic investments and projects
account to the office of state lands and investments for
any expenditures necessary to conduct the study required by
subsection (a) of this section, subject to subsection (f)
of this section. Funds appropriated under this subsection
may be used to retain a consultant to assist with the
completion of the study. This appropriation shall be for
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0069
ENROLLED ACT NO. 67, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
the period beginning with the effective date of this act
and ending June 30, 2030. This appropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose and any
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30,
2030. It is the intent of the legislature that this
appropriation not be included in the office of state lands
and investments' standard budget for the immediately
succeeding fiscal biennium.
(f) If the strategic investments and projects account
is repealed effective on or before July 1, 2026, then the
appropriation specified in subsection (e) of this section
shall be made from the general fund in the amount specified
in subsection (e) of this section. The appropriation from
the general fund specified in this subsection shall not be
made if funds are appropriated under subsection (e) of this
section from the strategic investments and projects
account.
3

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0069
ENROLLED ACT NO. 67, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
4